Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 53. Perpetuation of Land Survey Monuments

Editor’s note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 136, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1994, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1994, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor’s notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

38-53-101.
Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared to be a public policy of this state to encourage the establishment and preservation of accurate land boundaries, including durable monuments and complete public records, and to minimize the occurrence of land boundary disputes and discrepancies.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1522, § 48, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-101, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-102.
Applicability - state - county - local - persons.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all agencies of state, county, and local government as well as to individuals, corporations, and partnerships engaged in the private practice of land surveying.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1522, § 48, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-111, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-103.
Definitions.

As used in this article 53, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accessory” means any physical evidence in the vicinity of a survey monument, the relative location of which is of public record and which is used to help perpetuate the location of the monument. Accessories shall be construed to include the accessories recorded in the original survey notes and additional reference points and dimensions furnished by subsequent land surveyors or attested to in writing by persons having personal knowledge of the original location of the monument.

“Aliquot corner” means any section corner or quarter section corner and any other corner in the public land survey system created by subdividing land according to the rules of procedure set forth in section 38-51-103.

“Bench mark” means any relatively immovable point on the earth whose elevation above or below an adopted datum is known.

“Block” means a parcel of land within a platted subdivision bounded on all sides by streets or avenues, other physical boundaries such as a body of water, or the exterior boundary of a platted subdivision.

“Board” means the state board of licensure for architects, professional engineers, and professional land surveyors, created in section 12-120-103.

“Control corner” means any land survey corner the position of which controls the location of the boundaries of a tract or parcel of land.

(6.3)

“Corner” means a point of reference determined by the surveying process.

“Exemption plat” or “subdivision exemption plat” means a subdivision plat which includes all of the information required by section 38-51-106 and which depicts a division of land or the creation of an interest in property for which the board of county commissioners has granted an exemption from subdivision regulations pursuant to section 30-28-101 (10)(d), C.R.S.

“Improvement location certificate” means a representation of the boundaries of a parcel of land and the improvements thereon, prepared pursuant to section 38-51-108.

“Improvement survey plat” means a land survey plat as defined in subsection (12) of this section, resulting from a monumented land survey showing the location of all structures, visible utilities, fences, hedges, or walls situated on the described parcel and within five feet of all boundaries of such parcel, any conflicting boundary evidence or visible encroachments, and all easements, underground utilities, or tunnels, for which property recorded evidence is available from the county clerk and recorder, a title insurance company, or other source as specified on the improvement survey plat.

“Irregular parcel” means a parcel of land which is not uniquely defined on a subdivision plat but which is described by any of the following methods:

A metes and bounds description;

A book and page or reception number reference;

Any so-called “assessor’s tract”; or

A description which calls only for the owner’s or adjoiner’s name.

“Land survey” means a series of observations and measurements made pursuant to sections 38-51-103, 38-51-104, and 38-51-105 for the purpose of locating or restoring any real property boundary.

“Land survey plat” means a plat that shows the information developed by a monumented land survey or shows one or more set monuments pursuant to sections 38-51-104 and 38-51-105 and includes all information required by section 38-51-106.

(12.3)

“Monument” means the object or physical structure that marks the corner point.

“Monumented land survey” means a land survey in which monuments are either found or set pursuant to sections 38-51-103, 38-51-104, and 38-51-105 to mark the boundaries of a specified parcel of land.

“Monument record” means a written and illustrated document describing the physical appearance of a bench mark or survey monument and its accessories.

“Platted subdivision” means a group of lots, tracts, or parcels of land created by recording a map which meets the requirements of section 38-51-106 and which shows the boundaries of such lots, tracts, or parcels and the original parcel from which they were created.

“Professional land surveyor” means a person licensed pursuant to part 3 of article 120 of title 12.

“Property description” means a written, narrative description of a parcel of real property or an easement for the purpose of perpetuating location of title.

“Public land survey monument” means any land boundary monument established on the ground by a cadastral survey of the United States government and any mineral survey monument established by a United States mineral surveyor and made a part of the United States public land records.

“Responsible charge” means control and direction of surveying work.

“Subdivision plat” means a map of a platted subdivision recorded for the purpose of creating land parcels which can be identified uniquely by reference to such map.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1522, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(6) and (11) amended and (6.3) and (12.3) added, p. 1630, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5) and (16) amended, p. 1318, § 77, effective May 28.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 744, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(12) amended, p. 294, § 8, effective August 3.

L. 2019:

IP, (5), and (16) amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1727, § 247, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1994. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

38-53-104.
Submission of monument record required.

If a professional land surveyor conducts a survey that uses any monument representing a public land survey monument location, quarter section corner, sixteenth section corner, government land office or bureau of land management (government) lot corner as defined by the nomenclature of the United States public land survey system, or any United States geological survey or United States coast and geodetic survey (also known as the national ocean service/national geodetic survey) monument as a control corner, the professional land surveyor shall submit a monument record describing such monument with the board if the monument and its accessories are not substantially described in an existing monument record previously submitted pursuant to this section or its predecessor.

If a professional land surveyor establishes, restores, or rehabilitates any public land survey monument corner location or section corner, quarter section corner, or sixteenth section corner as defined by the nomenclature of the United States public land survey system, the professional land surveyor shall submit a monument record.

Any monument record submitted pursuant to this section must describe at least two accessories or reference points.

A professional land surveyor shall submit a monument record within six months after the date on which the monument was used as control or was established, restored, or rehabilitated.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 338, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2094, § 39, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-103, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-105.
Professional land surveyor must rehabilitate monuments.

For any monument record of a public land survey corner which is required to be submitted pursuant to this article, the professional land surveyor shall restore or rehabilitate the corner monument so it is readily identifiable and reasonably durable, if field conditions require it.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2095, § 40, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-104, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-106.
Form of monument records - prescribed by board.

The board shall adopt and revise as necessary the form and technical specifications for submission of monument records, including the information to be included with, or as part of, the records.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2095, § 41, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-105, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-107.
Monument records - conditions for acceptance.

The board shall not accept a monument record unless it complies with the form and technical specifications established by the board under section 38-53-106 and is signed, sealed, or otherwise authenticated by the professional land surveyor who was in responsible charge of the work.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2095, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-106, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-108.
Submission permitted on any survey monument.

A professional land surveyor may submit a monument record describing any land survey monument, accessory, or bench mark with the board.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2096, § 43, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-107, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-109.
Fees.

The board shall not charge a fee for submissions related to public land survey monuments and their accessories and aliquot corners or bench marks. For all other filings, the board may establish a fee pursuant to section 12-20-105, which shall be payable to the board at the time of submission.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1525, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended,(SB 13-161), ch. 356, p. 2096, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1727, § 248, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-53-109, as it existed prior to 1994.

38-53-110.
Violations.

It is the responsibility of the district attorneys of this state to prosecute any person suspected of willfully and knowingly violating this article.

Any person, including the responsible official of any agency of state, county, or local government, who willfully and knowingly violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars or more than one thousand five hundred dollars.

The board may revoke the licensure of any professional land surveyor convicted under the provisions of this article.

Any person whose licensure is revoked pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be entitled to a hearing on such revocation, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and may appeal any decision of the board to a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Source: L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1526, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1631, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1318, § 78, effective May 28.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-51-104, as it existed prior to 1994.